Nevada, session 83, AB140.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.291 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.291 1. An application for an instruction permit or for a
driver authorization card must:
(a) Be made upon a form furnished by the Department.
(b) Be verified by the applicant before a person authorized to
administer oaths. Officers and employees of the Department may
administer those oaths without charge.
(c) Be accompanied by the required fee.
(d) State the name, date of birth, sex and residence address of
the applicant and briefly describe the applicant.
(e) State whether the applicant has theretofore been licensed as a
driver, and, if so, when and by what state or country, and whether
any such license has ever been suspended or revoked, or whether an
application has ever been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason
for the suspension, revocation or refusal.
(f) Include such other information as the Department may
require to determine the competency and eligibility of the applicant.
2. Every applicant must furnish proof of his or her name and
age by displaying an original or certified copy of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) Any one of the following documents:
(1) A birth certificate issued by a state or a political
subdivision of a state;
(2) A driver’s license issued by another state which is issued
pursuant to the standards established by 6 C.F.R. Part 37, Subparts
A to E, inclusive, and which contains a security mark approved by
the United States Department of Homeland Security in accordance
with 6 C.F.R. § 37.17;
(3) A passport issued by the United States Government;
(4) A military identification card or military dependent
identification card issued by any branch of the Armed Forces of the
United States;
(5) For persons who served in any branch of the Armed
Forces of the United States, a report of separation;
(6) A Certificate of Degree of Indian or Alaska Native Blood
issued by the United States Government;
(7) A Certificate of Citizenship, Certificate of Naturalization,
Permanent Resident Card or Temporary Resident Card issued by the
United States Citizenship and Immigration Services of the
Department of Homeland Security;
(8) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the
Department of State;
(9) A document issued by the Department pursuant to NRS
483.375 or 483.8605; or
(10) Such other documentation as specified by the
Department by regulation; or
(b) Any two of the following documents:
(1) A driver’s license issued by another state other than such
a driver’s license described in subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a);
(2) A passport issued by a foreign government;
(3) A birth certificate issued by a foreign government;
(4) A consular identification card issued by the Government
of Mexico or a document issued by another government that the
Department determines is substantially similar; or
(5) Any other proof acceptable to the Department.
 No document which is written in a language other than English
may be accepted by the Department pursuant to this subsection
unless it is accompanied by a verified translation of the document in
the English language.
3. Every applicant must prove his or her residence in this State
by displaying an original or certified copy of any two of the
following documents:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) A receipt from the rent or lease of a residence located in this
State;
(b) A record from a public utility for a service address located in
this State which is dated within the previous 60 days;
(c) A bank or credit card statement indicating a residential
address located in this State which is dated within the previous 60
days;
(d) A stub from an employment check indicating a residential
address located in this State;
(e) A document issued by an insurance company or its agent,
including, without limitation, an insurance card, binder or bill,
indicating a residential address located in this State;
(f) A record, receipt or bill from a medical provider indicating a
residential address located in this State; or
(g) Any other document as prescribed by the Department by
regulation.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a driver
authorization card or instruction permit obtained in accordance with
this section must:
(a) Contain the same information as prescribed for a driver’s
license pursuant to NRS 483.340 and any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto;
(b) Be of the same design as a driver’s license and contain only
the minimum number of changes from that design that are necessary
to comply with subsection 5; and
(c) Be numbered from the same sequence of numbers as a
driver’s license.
5. A driver authorization card or instruction permit obtained in
accordance with this section must comply with the requirements of
section 202(d)(11) of the Real ID Act of 2005, Public Law 109-13,
Division B, Title II, 119 Stat. 302, 312-15, 49 U.S.C. § 30301 note.
6. [Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 483.380, every]
Every driver authorization card [:
(a) Expires on the fourth anniversary of the holder’s birthday,
measured in the case of initial issuance or renewal from the birthday
nearest the date of issuance or renewal.
(b) Is] is renewable at any time before its expiration upon
application and payment of the required fee. [The Department may,
by regulation, defer the expiration of the driver authorization card of
a person who is on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United
States upon such terms and conditions as it may prescribe. The
Department may similarly defer the expiration of the driver
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
authorization card of the spouse or dependent son or daughter of that
person if the spouse or child is residing with the person.]
7. A driver authorization card shall not be used to determine
eligibility for any benefits, licenses or services issued or provided by
this State or its political subdivisions.
8. Except as otherwise provided in this section or by specific
statute, any provision of this title that applies to drivers’ licenses
shall be deemed to apply to a driver authorization card and an
instruction permit obtained in accordance with this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 483.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.380 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.283,
every driver’s license and every driver authorization card expires
as prescribed by regulation.
2. The Department shall adopt regulations prescribing when a
driver’s license expires [.] and when a driver authorization card
expires. The Department may, by regulation, defer the expiration of
the driver’s license or driver authorization card of a person who is
on active duty in the Armed Forces upon such terms and conditions
as it may prescribe. The Department may similarly defer the
expiration of the driver’s license or driver authorization card of the
spouse or dependent son or daughter of that person if the spouse or
child is residing with the person.
3. Except as otherwise required by federal law, the
regulations required pursuant to subsection 2 must ensure that the
period between the issuance and expiration of a driver
authorization card is equal to the period between the issuance and
expiration of a driver’s license.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)